test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-haanis_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - häänis: # 2A v-k-v, C > C (pelikukke) / CC,
    häänis+N+Sg+Nom: häänis
    häänis+N+Sg+Gen: háánnás
    häänis+N+Sg+Acc: háánnás
    häänis+N+Sg+Ill: háṇásân
    häänis+N+Sg+Loc: háṇásist
    häänis+N+Sg+Com: háṇásáin
    häänis+N+Sg+Abe: [hánásttáá, háánnásttáá]
    häänis+N+Ess: [hánásin, hänisin]
    häänis+N+Par: [hánásid, hänisid]
    häänis+N+Pl+Nom: háṇáseh
    häänis+N+Pl+Gen: háṇásij
    häänis+N+Pl+Acc: háṇásijd
    häänis+N+Pl+Ill: háṇásáid
    häänis+N+Pl+Loc: háṇásijn
    häänis+N+Pl+Com: háṇásijguin
    häänis+N+Pl+Abe: háṇásijttáá
